Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF1165.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: ARTICLE 1 MINNESOTA HEALTH AND EDUCATION FACILITIES AUTHORITY Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 136A.25, is amended to read: 136A.25 CREATION. A state agency known as the Minnesota deleted text begin Higherdeleted text end new text begin Health and new text end Education Facilities Authority is hereby created. Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 136A.26, is amended to read: 136A.26 MEMBERSHIPS; OFFICERS; COMPENSATION; REMOVAL. Subdivision 1. Membership. The Minnesota deleted text begin Higherdeleted text end new text begin Health andnew text end Education Facilities Authority shall consist of deleted text begin eightdeleted text end new text begin ninenew text end members appointed by the governor with the advice and consent of the senate, and a representative of the deleted text begin officedeleted text end new text begin Office of Higher Educationnew text end . All members to be appointed by the governor shall be residents of the state. At least two members must reside outside the metropolitan area as defined in section 473.121, subdivision 2. At least one of the members shall be a person having a favorable reputation for skill, knowledge, and experience in the field of state and municipal finance; deleted text begin anddeleted text end at least one shall be a person having a favorable reputation for skill, knowledge, and experience in the building construction field; deleted text begin anddeleted text end at least one of the members shall be a trustee, director, officer, or employee of an institution of higher educationnew text begin ; and at least one of the members shall be a trustee, director, officer, or employee of a health care organizationnew text end . Subd. 1a. Private College Council member. The president of the Minnesota Private College Council, or the president's designee, shall serve without compensation as an advisory, nonvoting member of the authority. new text begin Subd. 1b. new text end new text begin Nonprofit health care association member. new text end new text begin The chief executive officer of a Minnesota nonprofit membership association whose members are primarily nonprofit health care organizations, or the chief executive officer's designee, shall serve without compensation as an advisory, nonvoting member of the authority. The identity of the Minnesota nonprofit membership association shall be determined and may be changed from time to time by the members of the authority in accordance with and as shall be provided in the bylaws of the authority. new text end Subd. 2. Term; compensation; removal. The membership terms, compensation, removal of members, and filling of vacancies for authority members other than the representative of the office, deleted text begin anddeleted text end the president of the Private College Council,new text begin or the chief executive officer of the Minnesota nonprofit membership association described in subdivision 1bnew text end shall be as provided in section 15.0575. Sec. 3. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 136A.27, is amended to read: 136A.27 POLICY. It is hereby declared that for the benefit of the people of the state, the increase of their commerce, welfare and prosperity and the improvement of their health and living conditions it is essential that new text begin health care organizations within the state be provided with appropriate additional means to establish, acquire, construct, improve, and expand health care facilities in furtherance of their purposes; that new text end this and future generations of youth be given the fullest opportunity to learn and to develop their intellectual and mental capacities; deleted text begin that it is essentialdeleted text end that institutions of higher education within the state be provided with appropriate additional means to assist deleted text begin suchdeleted text end youth in achieving the required levels of learning and development of their intellectual and mental capacitiesnew text begin ;new text end andnew text begin that health care organizations and institutions of higher educationnew text end be enabled to refinance outstanding indebtedness incurred to provide existing facilities used for deleted text begin suchdeleted text end new text begin thosenew text end purposes in order to preserve and enhance the utilization of facilities for purposes of new text begin health care and new text end higher education, to extend or adjust maturities in relation to the resources available for their payment, and to save interest costs and thereby reduce new text begin health care costs or higher education new text end tuition, feesnew text begin ,new text end and chargesdeleted text begin ; anddeleted text end new text begin . It is hereby further declarednew text end that it is the purpose of sections 136A.25 to 136A.42 to provide a measure of assistance and an alternative method to enable new text begin health care organizations and new text end institutions of higher education in the state to provide the facilities and structures which are sorely needed to accomplish the purposes of sections 136A.25 to 136A.42, all to the public benefit and good, to the extent and manner provided herein. Sec. 4. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 136A.28, is amended to read: 136A.28 DEFINITIONS. Subdivision 1. Scope. In sections 136A.25 to 136A.42, the following words and terms shall, unless the context otherwise requires, have the meanings ascribed to them. new text begin Subd. 1a. new text end new text begin Affiliate. new text end new text begin "Affiliate" means an entity that directly or indirectly controls, is controlled by, or is under common control with, another entity. For the purposes of this subdivision, "control" means either the power to elect a majority of the members of the governing body of an entity or the power, whether by contract or otherwise, to direct the management and policies of the entity. Affiliate also means an entity whose business or substantially all of whose property is operated under a lease, management agreement, or operating agreement by another entity, or an entity who operates the business or substantially all of the property of another entity under a lease, management agreement, or operating agreement. new text end Subd. 2. Authority. "Authority" means the deleted text begin Higherdeleted text end new text begin Health and new text end Education Facilities Authority created by sections 136A.25 to 136A.42. Subd. 3. Project. "Project" means deleted text begin a structure or structures available for use as a dormitory or other student housing facility, a dining hall, student union, administration building, academic building, library, laboratory, research facility, classroom, athletic facility, health care facility, child care facility, and maintenance, storage, or utility facility and other structures or facilities related thereto or required or useful for the instruction of students or the conducting of research or the operation of an institution of higher education, whether proposed, under construction, or completed, including parking and other facilities or structures essential or convenient for the orderly conduct of such institution for higher education, and shall also include landscaping, site preparation, furniture, equipment and machinery, and other similar items necessary or convenient for the operation of a particular facility or structure in the manner for which its use is intended but shall not include such items as books, fuel, supplies, or other items the costs of which are customarily deemed to result in a current operating charge, and shalldeleted text end new text begin a health care facility or an education facility whether proposed, under construction, or completed, and includes land or interests in land, appurtenances, site preparation, landscaping, buildings and structures, systems, fixtures, furniture, machinery, equipment, and parking. Project also includes other structures, facilities, improvements, machinery, equipment, and means of transport of a capital nature that are necessary or convenient for the operation of the facility. Project does new text end not includenew text begin : (1)new text end any facility used or to be used for sectarian instruction or as a place of religious worship deleted text begin nordeleted text end new text begin ; (2)new text end any facility which is used or to be used primarily in connection with any part of the program of a school or department of divinity for any religious denominationnew text begin ; nor (3) any books, supplies, medicine, medical supplies, fuel, or other items, the cost of which are customarily deemed to result in a current operating chargenew text end . Subd. 4. Cost. "Cost," as applied to a project or any portion deleted text begin thereofdeleted text end financed under the provisions of sections 136A.25 to 136A.42, means all or any part of the cost of construction, acquisition, alteration, enlargement, reconstruction and remodeling of a project including all lands, structures, real or personal property, rights, rights-of-way, franchises, easements and interests acquired or used for or in connection with a project, the cost of demolishing or removing any buildings or structures on land so acquired, including the cost of acquiring any lands to which deleted text begin suchdeleted text end new text begin thenew text end buildings or structures may be moved, the cost of all machinery and equipment, financing charges, interest prior to, during and for a period after completion of deleted text begin suchdeleted text end construction and acquisition, provisions for reserves for principal and interest and for extensions, enlargements, additions and improvements, the cost of architectural, engineering, financial and legal services, plans, specifications, studies, surveys, estimates of cost and of revenues, administrative expenses, expenses necessary or incident to determining the feasibility or practicability of constructing the project and deleted text begin suchdeleted text end other expenses as may be necessary or incident to the construction and acquisition of the project, the financing of deleted text begin suchdeleted text end construction and acquisition and the placing of the project in operation. Subd. 5. Bonds. "Bonds," or "revenue bonds" means revenue bonds of the authority issued under the provisions of sections 136A.25 to 136A.42, including revenue refunding bonds, notwithstanding that the same may be secured by mortgage or the full faith and credit of a participating institution deleted text begin for higher educationdeleted text end or any other lawfully pledged security of a participating institution deleted text begin for higher educationdeleted text end . Subd. 6. Institution of higher education. "Institution of higher education" means a nonprofit educational institution within the state authorized to provide a program of education beyond the high school level. new text begin Subd. 6a. new text end new text begin Health care organization. new text end new text begin (a) "Health care organization" means a nonprofit organization located within the state and authorized by law to operate a nonprofit health care facility in the state. Health care organization also means a nonprofit affiliate of a health care organization as defined under this paragraph, provided the affiliate is located within the state or within a state that is geographically contiguous to Minnesota. new text end new text begin (b) Health care organization also means a nonprofit organization located within another state that is geographically contiguous to Minnesota and authorized by law to operate a nonprofit health care facility in that state, provided that the nonprofit organization located within the contiguous state is an affiliate of a health care organization located within Minnesota. new text end new text begin Subd. 6b. new text end new text begin Education facility. new text end new text begin "Education facility" means a structure or structures available for use as a dormitory or other student housing facility, dining hall, student union, administration building, academic building, library, laboratory, research facility, classroom, athletic facility, student health care facility, or child care facility, and includes other facilities or structures related to the essential or convenient orderly conduct of an institution of higher education. new text end new text begin Subd. 6c. new text end new text begin Health care facility. new text end new text begin (a) "Health care facility" means a structure or structures available for use within this state as a hospital, clinic, psychiatric residential treatment facility, birth center, outpatient surgical center, comprehensive outpatient rehabilitation facility, outpatient physical therapy or speech pathology facility, end-stage renal dialysis facility, medical laboratory, pharmacy, radiation therapy facility, diagnostic imaging facility, medical office building, residence for nurses or interns, nursing home, boarding care home, assisted living facility, residential hospice, intermediate care facility for persons with developmental disabilities, supervised living facility, housing with services establishment, board and lodging establishment with special services, adult day care center, day services facility, prescribed pediatric extended care facility, community residential setting, adult foster home, or other facility related to medical or health care research, or the delivery or administration of health care services, and includes other structures or facilities related to the essential or convenient orderly conduct of a health care organization. new text end new text begin (b) Health care facility also means a facility in a state that is geographically contiguous to Minnesota operated by a health care organization that corresponds by purpose, function, or use with a facility listed in paragraph (a). new text end Subd. 7. Participating institution deleted text begin of higher educationdeleted text end . "Participating institution deleted text begin of higher educationdeleted text end " meansnew text begin a health care organization ornew text end an institution of higher education that, under the provisions of sections 136A.25 to 136A.42, undertakes the financing and construction or acquisition of a project or undertakes the refunding or refinancing of obligations or of a mortgage or of advances as provided in sections 136A.25 to 136A.42. Community colleges and technical colleges may be considered participating institutions deleted text begin of higher educationdeleted text end for the purpose of financing and constructing child care facilities and parking facilities. Sec. 5. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 136A.29, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Purpose. The purpose of the authority shall be to assist new text begin health care organizations and new text end institutions of higher education in the construction, financing, and refinancing of projects. The exercise by the authority of the powers conferred by sections 136A.25 to 136A.42, shall be deemed and held to be the performance of an essential public function. For the purpose of sections 136A.25 to 136A.42, the authority shall have the powers and duties set forth in subdivisions 2 to 23. Sec. 6. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 136A.29, subdivision 3, is amended to read: Subd. 3. Employeesnew text begin ; office spacenew text end . The authority is authorized and empowered to appoint and employ employees as it may deem necessary to carry out its duties, determine the title of the employees so employed, and fix the salary of deleted text begin saiddeleted text end new text begin itsnew text end employees. Employees of the authority shall participate in retirement and other benefits in the same manner that employees in the deleted text begin unclassified service of the officedeleted text end new text begin managerial plan under section 43A.18, subdivision 3,new text end participate.new text begin The authority may maintain an office space as it may designate.new text end Sec. 7. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 136A.29, subdivision 6, is amended to read: Subd. 6. Projects; generally. new text begin (a) new text end The authority is authorized and empowered to determine the location and character of any project to be financed under the provisions of sections 136A.25 to 136A.42, and to construct, reconstruct, remodel, maintain, manage, enlarge, alter, add to, repair, operate, lease, as lessee or lessor, and regulate the same, to enter into contracts for any or all of deleted text begin suchdeleted text end new text begin thesenew text end purposes, to enter into contracts for the management and operation of a project, and to designate a participating institution deleted text begin of higher educationdeleted text end as its agent to determine the location and character of a project undertaken by deleted text begin suchdeleted text end new text begin anew text end participating institution deleted text begin of higher educationdeleted text end under the provisions of sections 136A.25 to 136A.42 and as the agent of the authority, to construct, reconstruct, remodel, maintain, manage, enlarge, alter, add to, repair, operate, lease, as lessee or lessor, and regulate the same, and as the agent of the authority, to enter into contracts for any or all of deleted text begin suchdeleted text end new text begin thesenew text end purposes, including contracts for the management and operation of deleted text begin suchdeleted text end new text begin thenew text end project. new text begin (b) Notwithstanding paragraph (a), a project involving a health care facility within the state financed under sections 136A.25 to 136A.42, must comply with all applicable requirements in state law related to authorizing construction of or modifications to a health care facility, including the requirements of sections 144.5509, 144.551, 144A.071, and 252.291. new text end new text begin (c) new text end Contracts of the authority or of a participating institution deleted text begin of higher educationdeleted text end to acquire or to construct, reconstruct, remodel, maintain, enlarge, alter, add to, or repair projects shall not be subject to the provisions of chapter 16C or section 574.26, or any other public contract or competitive bid law. Sec. 8. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 136A.29, subdivision 9, is amended to read: Subd. 9. Revenue bonds; limit. new text begin (a) new text end The authority is authorized and empowered to issue revenue bonds whose aggregate principal amount at any time shall not exceed deleted text begin $2,000,000,000deleted text end new text begin $5,000,000,000new text end and to issue notes, bond anticipation notes, and revenue refunding bonds of the authority under the provisions of sections 136A.25 to 136A.42, to provide funds for acquiring, constructing, reconstructing, enlarging, remodeling, renovating, improving, furnishing, or equipping one or more projects or parts thereof. new text begin (b) Of the $5,000,000,000 limit in paragraph (a), the aggregate principal amount used to fund education facilities may not exceed $2,250,000,000 at any time, and the aggregate principal amount used to fund health care facilities may not exceed $2,750,000,000 at any time. new text end Sec. 9. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 136A.29, subdivision 10, is amended to read: Subd. 10. Revenue bonds; issuance, purpose, conditions. The authority is authorized and empowered to issue revenue bonds to acquire projects from or to make loans to participating institutions deleted text begin of higher educationdeleted text end and thereby refinance outstanding indebtedness incurred by participating institutions deleted text begin of higher educationdeleted text end to provide funds for the acquisition, construction or improvement of a facility before or after the enactment of sections 136A.25 to 136A.42, but otherwise eligible to be and being a project thereunder, whenever the authority finds that deleted text begin suchdeleted text end new text begin thenew text end refinancing will enhance or preserve such participating institutions and deleted text begin suchdeleted text end new text begin thenew text end facilities or utilization deleted text begin thereofdeleted text end new text begin that isnew text end for new text begin health care or new text end educational purposes or extend or adjust maturities to correspond to the resources available for their payment, or reduce new text begin charges or fees imposed on patients or occupants, or new text end the tuition, chargesnew text begin ,new text end or fees imposed on students for the use new text begin or occupancy new text end of the facilities of deleted text begin suchdeleted text end new text begin thenew text end participating institutions deleted text begin of higher educationdeleted text end or costs met by federal or state public funds, or enhance or preserve new text begin health care or new text end educational programs and research or the acquisition or improvement of other facilities eligible to be a project or part thereof by the participating institution deleted text begin of higher educationdeleted text end . The amount of revenue bonds to be issued to refinance outstanding indebtedness of a participating institution deleted text begin of higher educationdeleted text end shall not exceed the lesser of (a) the fair value of the project to be acquired by the authority from the institution or mortgaged to the authority by the institution or (b) the amount of the outstanding indebtedness including any premium thereon and any interest accrued or to accrue to the date of redemption and any legal, fiscal and related costs in connection with deleted text begin suchdeleted text end new text begin thenew text end refinancing and reasonable reserves, as determined by the authority. The provisions of this subdivision do not prohibit the authority from issuing revenue bonds within and charged against the limitations provided in subdivision 9 to provide funds for improvements, alteration, renovation, or extension of the project refinanced. Sec. 10. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 136A.29, subdivision 14, is amended to read: Subd. 14. Rules for use of projects. The authority is authorized and empowered to establish rules for the use of a project or any portion thereof and to designate a participating institution deleted text begin of higher educationdeleted text end as its agent to establish rules for the use of a project undertaken for deleted text begin suchdeleted text end new text begin anew text end participating institution deleted text begin of higher educationdeleted text end . Sec. 11. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 136A.29, subdivision 19, is amended to read: Subd. 19. Surety. Before the issuance of any revenue bonds under the provisions of sections 136A.25 to 136A.42, any member or officer of the authority authorized by resolution of the authority to handle funds or sign checks of the authority shall be covered under a surety or fidelity bond in an amount to be determined by the authority. Each deleted text begin suchdeleted text end bond shall be conditioned upon the faithful performance of the duties of the office of the member or officer, new text begin and new text end shall be executed by a surety company authorized to transact business in the state of Minnesota as surety. The cost of each deleted text begin suchdeleted text end bond shall be paid by the authority. Sec. 12. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 136A.29, subdivision 20, is amended to read: Subd. 20. Sale, lease, and disposal of property. The authority is authorized and empowered to sell, lease, releasenew text begin ,new text end or otherwise dispose of real and personal property or interests therein, or a combination thereof, acquired by the authority under authority of sections 136A.25 to 136A.42 and no longer needed for the purposes of deleted text begin suchdeleted text end new text begin thisnew text end chapter or of the authority, and grant deleted text begin suchdeleted text end easements and other rights in, over, under, or across a project as will not interfere with its use of deleted text begin suchdeleted text end new text begin thenew text end property. deleted text begin Suchdeleted text end new text begin Thenew text end sale, lease, release, disposition, or grant may be made without competitive bidding and in deleted text begin suchdeleted text end new text begin thenew text end mannernew text begin andnew text end for such consideration as the authority in its judgment deems appropriate. Sec. 13. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 136A.29, subdivision 21, is amended to read: Subd. 21. Loans. The authority is authorized and empowered to make loans to any participating institution deleted text begin of higher educationdeleted text end for the cost of a project in accordance with an agreement between the authority and the participating institution deleted text begin of higher educationdeleted text end ; provided that no deleted text begin suchdeleted text end loan shall exceed the total cost of the project as determined by the participating institution deleted text begin of higher educationdeleted text end and approved by the authority. Sec. 14. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 136A.29, subdivision 22, is amended to read: Subd. 22. Costs, expenses, and other charges. The authority is authorized and empowered to charge to and apportion among participating institutions deleted text begin of higher educationdeleted text end its administrative costs and expenses incurred in the exercise of the powers and duties conferred by sections 136A.25 to 136A.42new text begin in the manner as the authority in its judgment deems appropriatenew text end . Sec. 15. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 136A.29, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 24. new text end new text begin Determination of affiliate status. new text end new text begin The authority is authorized and empowered to determine whether an entity is an affiliate as defined in section 136A.28, subdivision 1a. A determination by the authority of affiliate status shall be deemed conclusive for the purposes of sections 136A.25 to 136A.42. new text end Sec. 16. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 136A.32, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Bonds; generally. new text begin (a) new text end The authority may from time to time issue revenue bonds for purposes of sections 136A.25 to 136A.42, and all deleted text begin suchdeleted text end revenue bonds, notes, bond anticipation notes or other obligations of the authority issued pursuant to sections 136A.25 to 136A.42 shall be and are hereby declared to be negotiable for all purposes notwithstanding their payment from a limited source and without regard to any other law or laws. In anticipation of the sale of deleted text begin suchdeleted text end revenue bonds, the authority may issue negotiable bond anticipation notes and may renew the same from time to time, but the maximum maturity of any deleted text begin suchdeleted text end note, including renewals deleted text begin thereofdeleted text end , shall not exceed five years from the date of issue of the original note. deleted text begin Suchdeleted text end Notes shall be paid from any revenues of the authority available therefor and not otherwise pledged, or from the proceeds of sale of the revenue bonds of the authority in anticipation of which they were issued. The notes shall be issued in the same manner as the revenue bonds. Such notes and the resolution or resolutions authorizing the same may contain any provisions, conditions or limitations which a bond resolution or the authority may contain. new text begin (b) Before issuing revenue bonds, notes, or other obligations under paragraph (a) on behalf of a health care organization to finance health care facilities, the authority must obtain consent by resolution from each city or town in which the project is located, except that consent need not be obtained in the case of a city or town with a population of less than 100,000. The consent by resolution requirement does not apply to financing under paragraph (a) on behalf of a participating institution which is primarily an institution of higher education. new text end Sec. 17. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 136A.32, subdivision 4, is amended to read: Subd. 4. Provisions of resolution authorizing bonds. Any resolution or resolutions authorizing any revenue bonds or any issue of revenue bonds may contain provisions, which shall be a part of the contract with the holders of the revenue bonds to be authorized, as to: (1) pledging all or any part of the revenues of a project or projects, any revenue producing contract or contracts made by the authority with deleted text begin any individual partnership, corporation or association or other bodydeleted text end new text begin one or more partnerships, corporations or associations, or other bodiesnew text end , public or private, to secure the payment of the revenue bonds or of any particular issue of revenue bonds, subject to deleted text begin suchdeleted text end agreements with bondholders as may then exist; (2) the rentals, fees and other charges to be charged, and the amounts to be raised in each year thereby, and the use and disposition of the revenues; (3) the setting aside of reserves or sinking funds, and the regulation and disposition deleted text begin thereofdeleted text end new text begin of themnew text end ; (4) limitations on the right of the authority or its agent to restrict and regulate the use of the project; (5) limitations on the purpose to which the proceeds of sale of any issue of revenue bonds then or thereafter to be issued may be applied and pledging deleted text begin suchdeleted text end new text begin thenew text end proceeds to secure the payment of the revenue bonds or any issue of the revenue bonds; (6) limitations on the issuance of additional bonds, the terms upon which additional bonds may be issued and secured and the refunding of outstanding bonds; (7) the procedure, if any, by which the terms of any contract with bondholders may be amended or abrogated, the amount of bonds the holders of which must consent deleted text begin theretodeleted text end new text begin tonew text end , and the manner in which deleted text begin suchdeleted text end consent may be given; (8) limitations on the amount of moneys derived from the project to be expended for operating, administrative or other expenses of the authority; (9) defining the acts or omissions to act which shall constitute a default in the duties of the authority to holders of its obligations and providing the rights and remedies of deleted text begin suchdeleted text end new text begin thenew text end holders in the event of a default;new text begin ornew text end (10) the mortgaging of a project and the site thereof for the purpose of securing the bondholders. Sec. 18. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 136A.32, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 4a. new text end new text begin Health care certification. new text end new text begin Health care organizations must provide the authority with a signed certificate from the health care organization stating that so long as authority financing for the health care organization remains outstanding, none of the proceeds of the bonds to the health care organization may be directly or indirectly used to benefit a private party or private equity-funded entity. new text end Sec. 19. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 136A.33, is amended to read: 136A.33 TRUST AGREEMENT. In the discretion of the authority any revenue bonds issued under the provisions of sections 136A.25 to 136A.42, may be secured by a trust agreement by and between the authority and a corporate trustee or trustees, which may be any trust company or bank having the powers of a trust company within the state. deleted text begin Suchdeleted text end new text begin Thenew text end trust agreement or the resolution providing for the issuance of deleted text begin suchdeleted text end revenue bonds may pledge or assign the revenues to be received or proceeds of any contract or contracts pledged and may convey or mortgage the project or any portion deleted text begin thereofdeleted text end new text begin of itnew text end . deleted text begin Suchdeleted text end new text begin Thenew text end trust agreement or resolution providing for the issuance of deleted text begin suchdeleted text end revenue bonds may contain deleted text begin suchdeleted text end provisions for protecting and enforcing the rights and remedies of the bondholders as may be reasonable and proper and not in violation of laws, including deleted text begin particularly suchdeleted text end new text begin particularnew text end provisions deleted text begin as have hereinabovedeleted text end new text begin that havenew text end been specifically authorized to be included in any resolution or resolutions of the authority authorizing revenue bonds deleted text begin thereofdeleted text end . Any bank or trust company incorporated under the laws of the state deleted text begin whichdeleted text end new text begin thatnew text end may act as depository of the proceeds of bonds or of revenues or other moneys may furnish deleted text begin suchdeleted text end indemnifying bonds or deleted text begin pledges suchdeleted text end new text begin pledge new text end securities as may be required by the authority. Any deleted text begin suchdeleted text end trust agreement may set forth the rights and remedies of the bondholders and of the trustee or trustees and may restrict the individual right of action by bondholders. In addition to the foregoing, any deleted text begin suchdeleted text end trust agreement or resolution may contain deleted text begin suchdeleted text end other provisions as the authority may deem reasonable and proper for the security of the bondholders. All expenses incurred in carrying out the provisions of deleted text begin suchdeleted text end new text begin thenew text end trust agreement or resolution may be treated as a part of the cost of the operation of a project. Sec. 20. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 136A.34, subdivision 3, is amended to read: Subd. 3. Investment. Any deleted text begin suchdeleted text end escrowed proceeds, pending deleted text begin suchdeleted text end use, may be invested and reinvested in direct obligations of the United States of America, or in certificates of deposit or time deposits secured by direct obligations of the United States of America, new text begin or in shares or units in any money market mutual fund whose investment portfolio consists solely of direct obligations of the United States of America, new text end maturing at deleted text begin suchdeleted text end new text begin anew text end time or times as shall be appropriate to assure the prompt payment, as to principal, interest and redemption premium, if any, of the outstanding revenue bonds to be so refunded. The interest, income and profits, if any, earned or realized on any deleted text begin suchdeleted text end investment may also be applied to the payment of the outstanding revenue bonds to be so refunded. After the terms of the escrow have been fully satisfied and carried out, any balance of deleted text begin suchdeleted text end new text begin thenew text end proceeds and interest, income and profits, if any, earned or realized on the investments deleted text begin thereofdeleted text end may be returned to the authority for use by it in any lawful manner. Sec. 21. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 136A.34, subdivision 4, is amended to read: Subd. 4. Additional purpose; improvements. The portion of the proceeds of any deleted text begin suchdeleted text end revenue bonds issued for the additional purpose of paying all or any part of the cost of constructing and acquiring additions, improvements, extensions or enlargements of a project may be invested or deposited deleted text begin in time depositsdeleted text end as provided in section 136A.32, subdivision 7. Sec. 22. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 136A.36, is amended to read: 136A.36 REVENUES. The authority may fix, revise, charge and collect rates, rents, fees and charges for the use of and for the services furnished or to be furnished by each project and deleted text begin todeleted text end new text begin maynew text end contract with any person, partnership, association or corporation, or other body, public or private, in respect thereof. deleted text begin Suchdeleted text end new text begin Thenew text end rates, rents, feesnew text begin ,new text end and charges new text begin may vary between projects involving an education facility and projects involving a health care facility and new text end shall be fixed and adjusted in respect of the aggregate of rates, rents, feesnew text begin ,new text end and charges from deleted text begin suchdeleted text end new text begin thenew text end project so as to provide funds sufficient with other revenues, if any: (1) to pay the cost of maintaining, repairing and operating the project and each and every portion deleted text begin thereofdeleted text end new text begin of itnew text end , to the extent that the payment of deleted text begin suchdeleted text end new text begin thenew text end cost has not otherwise been adequately provided for; (2) to pay the principal of and the interest on outstanding revenue bonds of the authority issued in respect of such project as the same shall become due and payable; and (3) to create and maintain reserves required or provided for in any resolution authorizing, or trust agreement securing, deleted text begin suchdeleted text end revenue bonds of the authority. deleted text begin Suchdeleted text end new text begin Thenew text end rates, rents, fees and charges shall not be subject to supervision or regulation by any department, commission, board, body, bureau or agency of this state other than the authority. A sufficient amount of the revenues derived in respect of a project, except deleted text begin suchdeleted text end part of deleted text begin suchdeleted text end new text begin thenew text end revenues as may be necessary to pay the cost of maintenance, repair and operation and to provide reserves and for renewals, replacements, extensions, enlargements and improvements as may be provided for in the resolution authorizing the issuance of any revenue bonds of the authority or in the trust agreement securing the same, shall be set aside at deleted text begin suchdeleted text end regular intervals as may be provided in deleted text begin suchdeleted text end new text begin thenew text end resolution or trust agreement in a sinking or other similar fund deleted text begin whichdeleted text end new text begin thatnew text end is hereby pledged to, and charged with, the payment of the principal of and the interest on deleted text begin suchdeleted text end revenue bonds as the same shall become due, and the redemption price or the purchase price of bonds retired by call or purchase as therein provided. deleted text begin Suchdeleted text end new text begin Thenew text end pledge shall be valid and binding from the time when the pledge is made; the rates, rents, fees and charges and other revenues or other moneys so pledged and thereafter received by the authority shall immediately be subject to the lien of deleted text begin suchdeleted text end new text begin thenew text end pledge without physical delivery deleted text begin thereofdeleted text end or further act, and the lien of any deleted text begin suchdeleted text end pledge shall be valid and binding as against all parties having claims of any kind against the authority, irrespective of whether deleted text begin suchdeleted text end new text begin thenew text end parties have notice deleted text begin thereofdeleted text end new text begin of itnew text end . Neither the resolution nor any trust agreement by which a pledge is created need be filed or recorded except in the records of the authority. The use and disposition of moneys to the credit of deleted text begin suchdeleted text end new text begin anew text end sinking or other similar fund shall be subject to the provisions of the resolution authorizing the issuance of deleted text begin suchdeleted text end bonds or of deleted text begin suchdeleted text end new text begin anew text end trust agreement. Except as may otherwise be provided in deleted text begin suchdeleted text end new text begin thenew text end resolution or deleted text begin suchdeleted text end trust agreement, deleted text begin suchdeleted text end new text begin thenew text end sinking or other similar fund shall be a fund for all deleted text begin suchdeleted text end revenue bonds issued to finance a project or projects at one or more participating institutions deleted text begin of higher educationdeleted text end without distinction or priority of one over another; provided the authority in any deleted text begin suchdeleted text end resolution or trust agreement may provide that deleted text begin suchdeleted text end new text begin thenew text end sinking or other similar fund shall be the fund for a particular project at deleted text begin andeleted text end new text begin a participatingnew text end institution deleted text begin of higher educationdeleted text end and for the revenue bonds issued to finance a particular project and may, additionally, permit and provide for the issuance of revenue bonds having a subordinate lien in respect of the security herein authorized to other revenue bonds of the authority and, in such case, the authority may create separate or other similar funds in respect of deleted text begin suchdeleted text end new text begin thenew text end subordinate lien bonds. Sec. 23. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 136A.38, is amended to read: 136A.38 BONDS ELIGIBLE FOR INVESTMENT. Bonds issued bynew text begin thenew text end authority under the provisions of sections 136A.25 to 136A.42, are hereby made securities in which all public officers and public bodies of the state and its political subdivisions, all insurance companies, trust companies, banking associations, investment companies, executors, administrators, trustees and other fiduciaries may properly and legally invest funds, including capital in their control or belonging to them; it being the purpose of this section to authorize the investment in deleted text begin suchdeleted text end bonds of all sinking, insurance, retirement, compensation, pension and trust funds, whether owned or controlled by private or public persons or officers; provided, however, that nothing contained in this section may be construed as relieving any person, firm, or corporation from any duty of exercising due care in selecting securities for purchase or investment; and provide further, that in no event shall assets of pension funds of public employees of the state of Minnesota or any of its agencies, boards or subdivisions, whether publicly or privately administered, be invested in bonds issued under the provisions of sections 136A.25 to 136A.42. Such bonds are hereby constituted "authorized securities" within the meaning and for the purposes of Minnesota Statutes 1969, section 50.14. deleted text begin Suchdeleted text end new text begin Thenew text end bonds are hereby made securities deleted text begin whichdeleted text end new text begin thatnew text end may properly and legally be deposited with and received by any state or municipal officer or any agency or political subdivision of the state for any purpose for which the deposit of bonds or obligations of the state now or may hereafter be authorized by law. Sec. 24. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 136A.41, is amended to read: 136A.41 CONFLICT OF INTEREST. Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary it shall not be or constitute a conflict of interest for a trustee, director, officer or employee of any participating institution deleted text begin of higher educationdeleted text end , financial institution, investment banking firm, brokerage firm, commercial bank or trust company, architecture firm, insurance company, construction company, or any other firm, person or corporation to serve as a member of the authority, provided deleted text begin suchdeleted text end new text begin thenew text end trustee, director, officer or employee shall abstain from deliberation, action and vote by the authority in each instance where the business affiliation of any deleted text begin suchdeleted text end trustee, director, officer or employee is involved. Sec. 25. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 136A.42, is amended to read: 136A.42 ANNUAL REPORT. The authority shall keep an accurate account of all of its activities and all of its receipts and expenditures deleted text begin and shall annually report to the officedeleted text end .new text begin Each year, the authority shall submit to the Minnesota Historical Society and the Legislative Reference Library a report of the authority's activities in the previous year, including all financial activities.new text end Sec. 26. new text begin REVISOR INSTRUCTION.new text end new text begin The revisor of statutes shall renumber the law establishing and governing the Minnesota Higher Education Facilities Authority, renamed the Minnesota Health and Education Facilities Authority in this act, as Minnesota Statutes, chapter 15D, coded in Minnesota Statutes 2020, sections 136A.25 to 136A.42, as amended or repealed in this act. The revisor of statutes shall also duplicate any required definitions from Minnesota Statutes, chapter 136A, revise any statutory cross-references consistent with the recoding, and report the history in Minnesota Statutes, chapter 15D. The revisor of statutes shall change "Minnesota Higher Education Facilities Authority" to "Minnesota Health and Higher Education Facilities Authority" where it appears in Minnesota Statutes. new text end Sec. 27. new text begin REPEALER.new text end new text begin Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 136A.29, subdivision 4, new text end new text begin is repealed. new text end ARTICLE 2 MINNESOTA HEALTH AND EDUCATION FACILITIES AUTHORITY CONFORMING AMENDMENTS Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 3.732, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Definitions. As used in this section and section 3.736 the terms defined in this section have the meanings given them. (1) "State" includes each of the departments, boards, agencies, commissions, courts, and officers in the executive, legislative, and judicial branches of the state of Minnesota and includes but is not limited to the Housing Finance Agency, the Minnesota Office of Higher Education, the deleted text begin Higherdeleted text end new text begin Health andnew text end Education Facilities Authority, the Health Technology Advisory Committee, the Armory Building Commission, the Zoological Board, the Department of Iron Range Resources and Rehabilitation, the Minnesota Historical Society, the State Agricultural Society, the University of Minnesota, the Minnesota State Colleges and Universities, state hospitals, and state penal institutions. It does not include a city, town, county, school district, or other local governmental body corporate and politic. (2) "Employee of the state" means all present or former officers, members, directors, or employees of the state, members of the Minnesota National Guard, members of a bomb disposal unit approved by the commissioner of public safety and employed by a municipality defined in section 466.01 when engaged in the disposal or neutralization of bombs or other similar hazardous explosives, as defined in section 299C.063, outside the jurisdiction of the municipality but within the state, or persons acting on behalf of the state in an official capacity, temporarily or permanently, with or without compensation. It does not include either an independent contractor except, for purposes of this section and section 3.736 only, a guardian ad litem acting under court appointment, or members of the Minnesota National Guard while engaged in training or duty under United States Code, title 10, or title 32, section 316, 502, 503, 504, or 505, as amended through December 31, 1983. Notwithstanding sections 43A.02 and 611.263, for purposes of this section and section 3.736 only, "employee of the state" includes a district public defender or assistant district public defender in the Second or Fourth Judicial District, a member of the Health Technology Advisory Committee, and any officer, agent, or employee of the state of Wisconsin performing work for the state of Minnesota pursuant to a joint state initiative. (3) "Scope of office or employment" means that the employee was acting on behalf of the state in the performance of duties or tasks lawfully assigned by competent authority. (4) "Judicial branch" has the meaning given in section 43A.02, subdivision 25. Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 10A.01, subdivision 35, is amended to read: Subd. 35. Public official. "Public official" means any: (1) member of the legislature; (2) individual employed by the legislature as secretary of the senate, legislative auditor, director of the Legislative Budget Office, chief clerk of the house of representatives, revisor of statutes, or researcher, legislative analyst, fiscal analyst, or attorney in the Office of Senate Counsel, Research and Fiscal Analysis, House Research, or the House Fiscal Analysis Department; (3) constitutional officer in the executive branch and the officer's chief administrative deputy; (4) solicitor general or deputy, assistant, or special assistant attorney general; (5) commissioner, deputy commissioner, or assistant commissioner of any state department or agency as listed in section 15.01 or 15.06, or the state chief information officer; (6) member, chief administrative officer, or deputy chief administrative officer of a state board or commission that has either the power to adopt, amend, or repeal rules under chapter 14, or the power to adjudicate contested cases or appeals under chapter 14; (7) individual employed in the executive branch who is authorized to adopt, amend, or repeal rules under chapter 14 or adjudicate contested cases under chapter 14; (8) executive director of the State Board of Investment; (9) deputy of any official listed in clauses (7) and (8); (10) judge of the Workers' Compensation Court of Appeals; (11) administrative law judge or compensation judge in the State Office of Administrative Hearings or unemployment law judge in the Department of Employment and Economic Development; (12) member, regional administrator, division director, general counsel, or operations manager of the Metropolitan Council; (13) member or chief administrator of a metropolitan agency; (14) director of the Division of Alcohol and Gambling Enforcement in the Department of Public Safety; (15) member or executive director of the deleted text begin Higherdeleted text end new text begin Health andnew text end Education Facilities Authority; (16) member of the board of directors or president of Enterprise Minnesota, Inc.; (17) member of the board of directors or executive director of the Minnesota State High School League; (18) member of the Minnesota Ballpark Authority established in section 473.755; (19) citizen member of the Legislative-Citizen Commission on Minnesota Resources; (20) manager of a watershed district, or member of a watershed management organization as defined under section 103B.205, subdivision 13; (21) supervisor of a soil and water conservation district; (22) director of Explore Minnesota Tourism; (23) citizen member of the Lessard-Sams Outdoor Heritage Council established in section 97A.056; (24) citizen member of the Clean Water Council established in section 114D.30; (25) member or chief executive of the Minnesota Sports Facilities Authority established in section 473J.07; (26) district court judge, appeals court judge, or supreme court justice; (27) county commissioner; (28) member of the Greater Minnesota Regional Parks and Trails Commission; (29) member of the Destination Medical Center Corporation established in section 469.41; or (30) chancellor or member of the Board of Trustees of the Minnesota State Colleges and Universities. Sec. 3. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 136F.67, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Authorization. A technical college or a community college must not seek financing for child care facilities or parking facilities through the deleted text begin Higherdeleted text end new text begin Health andnew text end Education Facilities Authority, as provided in section 136A.28, subdivision 7, without the explicit authorization of the board. Sec. 4. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 354B.20, subdivision 7, is amended to read: Subd. 7. Employing unit. "Employing unit," if the agency employs any persons covered by the individual retirement account plan under section 354B.211, means: (1) the board; (2) the Minnesota Office of Higher Education; and (3) the deleted text begin Higherdeleted text end new text begin Health andnew text end Education Facilities Authority. APPENDIX Repealed Minnesota Statutes: 25-01454 136A.29 POWERS; DUTIES. Subd. 4. Mutual agreement; staff, equipment, office space. By mutual agreement between the authority and the office, authority staff employees may also be members of the office staff. By mutual agreement, authority employees may be provided office space in the office of the Office of Higher Education, and said employees may make use of equipment, supplies, and office space, provided that the authority fully reimburses the office for salaries and for space, equipment, supplies, and materials used. In the absence of such mutual agreement between the authority and the office, the authority may maintain an office at such place or places as it may designate.